District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as the "Health Professional Loan Repayment Amendment Act
of 2026."
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Health Professional Recruitment Program Act of
2005, effective March 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-71; D.C. Official Code§ 7-751.01 et seq.),
is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(6) (D.C. Official Code§ 7-751.01(6)) is amended by striking the
phrase "or physician assistants" and inserting the phrase "physician assistants, or certified
addiction counselors" in its place.
(b) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code§ 7-751.08) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
"(a) Physicians and dentists who are full-time participants in the Program shall be
eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $165,000, repaid by the

Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual repayment amount for each
such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director
required by section 8.”.
(2) Subsection (a-1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a-1) Physicians who are full-time participants in the Program and who
specialize and practice in obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, or another medical
specialty identified by the Director or who sub-specialize and practice in oncology,
cardiology, neurology, infectious diseases, pulmonary diseases, nephrology,
endocrinology, podiatry, ophthalmology, or another medical sub-specialty identified by
the Director shall be eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed
$200,000, repaid by the Program for up to 4 years of service; provided, that the
participants practice in Ward 7 or 8 for the contractually required number of hours
for full-time service. The maximum annual repayment amount for each such participant
shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director required by
section 8.”.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) Other health professionals who are full-time participants in the Program shall
be eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $90,000, repaid by the
Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual repayment amount for each
such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director
required by section 8.”.
(4) Subsection (c) is repealed.
(5) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:


“(d) Physicians and dentists who are part-time participants in the Program shall be
eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $82,000, repaid by the
Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual repayment amount for each
such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director
required by section 8.”.
(6) Subsection (e) is amended to read as follows:
“(e) Physicians who are part-time participants in the Program and who specialize
and practice in obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, or another medical specialty
identified by the Director or who sub-specialize and practice in oncology, cardiology,
neurology, infectious diseases, pulmonary diseases, nephrology, endocrinology, podiatry,
ophthalmology, or another medical sub-specialty identified by the Director shall be
eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $100,000, repaid by the
Program for up to 4 years of service; provided, that the participants practice in Ward 7 or
8 for the contractually required number of hours for part-time service. The maximum
annual repayment amount for each such participant shall be set forth in the contract
between the participant and the Director required by section 8.”.
(7) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
“(f) Other health professionals who are part-time participants in the Program shall
be eligible to have up to 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $45,000, repaid by the
Program for up to 4 years of service. The maximum annual repayment amount for each
such participant shall be set forth in the contract between the participant and the Director
required by section 8.”.
(8) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:


“(g)(1) The Mayor may, by rule, annually increase the maximum total loan
repayment amounts set forth in this subsection by the annual percentage increase in the
consumer price index.
“(2) The Mayor shall, by rule, establish the maximum percentage and
maximum dollar amount of a participant’s total debt that may be repaid annually. The
maximum annual percentage shall not exceed 30% of the participant’s total debt and the
maximum dollar amount shall not exceed 30% of the applicable maximum total loan
repayment amount.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the
fiscal impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home
Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-
206.02(c)(3)).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of
Congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home
Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973, (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-
206.02(c)(1)).